Utah statutes.
76-10-1229.5.   Breast feeding is not violation of this part.

A woman's breast feeding, including breast feeding in any location where the woman otherwise may rightfully  be, does not under any circumstance constitute a violation of this part, irrespective of whether or not the breast is covered during or incidental to feeding.



Enacted by Chapter 131, 1995 General Session

